Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 2

Unstamped Beverages — Unlicensed Dealers

57-9-201. Beverages owned, possessed or sold by unlicensed persons deemed contraband — Untaxed alcoholic beverages — Seizure and sale — Vehicles subject to confiscation.

All alcoholic beverages of more than five percent (5%) alcohol in excess of five gallons (5 gals.) that are owned or possessed by any person in any county of this state, whether or not such county has authorized the sale or distribution of alcohol within its jurisdiction, without the same having been purchased or obtained from an entity holding a license issued under § 57-3-204, § 57-3-203 or § 57-3-207, or manufactured at an entity holding a license issued under § 57-3-218, are declared to be contraband goods, and the same may be seized by the representative, agent or employee of the commission, or sheriff or deputy sheriffs of any such county, and such goods may be delivered to the alcoholic beverage commission for sale by the commissioner of general services in accordance with §§ 12-2-201 — 12-2-204. The reference to “sheriff or deputy sheriffs” in the preceding sentence also includes “constables” in those counties of this state enumerated in § 57-9-101. All alcoholic beverages, which are sold or stored in wet counties for the purpose of sale by a person who does not hold a state liquor license shall be contraband within the meaning of this part, and subject to seizure as provided herein. No bids shall be received on such contraband beverages except from persons duly licensed by the state to handle alcoholic beverages of more than five percent (5%).

Any vehicle, aircraft or boat not a common carrier which may be used for transportation or storage, either in wet or dry counties, for the purpose of distribution, gift or sale of untaxed alcoholic beverages shall likewise be subject to confiscation and sale in the manner herein provided. Should any untaxed alcoholic beverages be found in any vehicle, aircraft or boat, same shall be prima facie evidence that it was there for gift, sale or distribution.

Vehicles and any other articles of personal property which may be found at a still, still site, or place of storage, which still, still site or place of storage is being used by persons known or unknown who have failed to procure a state liquor license, or have failed to pay the taxes imposed by § 57-3-302 are declared to be contraband goods and shall likewise be subject to confiscation and sale in the manner herein provided; however, before any vehicle declared to be contraband, under this part, is sold as provided herein, a copy of notice of seizure shall be sent by registered mail to the owner and lienholder as of record in the motor vehicle division of the department of revenue. Such notice shall state a general description of the seized vehicle, the reasons for the seizure, the procedure by which recovery of the vehicle may be sought, including the time period in which a claim for recovery must be presented, and the consequences of failing to file within the time period. A copy of the notice shall be filed in the office of the commission and shall be open to the public for inspection.

This section shall be applicable to dry counties in like manner as to wet counties.

In the case of any vehicle, aircraft, or boat not a common carrier seized by any law enforcement officer of any incorporated municipality or of any county and turned over to the commission for confiscation, fifty percent (50%) of the amount received from the sale thereof shall be paid to the municipality or to the county served by such law enforcement officer, as the case may be.

The presence of alcoholic beverages at a still, still site or place of storage in excess of one gallon (1 gal.) without a bill of lading or receipt from a licensed retailer, wholesaler, winery or manufacturer shall create a rebuttable presumption that the taxes imposed by § 57-3-302 have not been paid.

Acts 1941, ch. 119, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.24 (Williams, § 6648.26); Acts 1955, ch. 347, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1959, ch. 267, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 303, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; Acts 1963, ch. 258, § 1; 1967, ch. 72, § 1; 1969, ch. 160, § 3; 1969, ch. 319, §§ 3, 4; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 357, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-622; Acts 1992, ch. 608, §§ 13-16; 2009, ch. 434, § 11; 2011, ch. 451, § 8; 2017, ch. 147, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. The commissioner of general services, referred to in this section, was changed to chief procurement officer in §§12-2-201 –12-2-204 by Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 9(a), effective April 1, 2012.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Forfeiture of conveyances used in theft, title 40, ch. 33.

Procedure for seizing contraband property in cases of seizure of alcoholic beverages, §57-9-202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 18.237.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 22, 23, 26, 28.

Law Reviews.

Forfeitures Under the Tennessee Drug Control Act (Lewis L. Laska), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1986).

57-9-202. Procedure for seizing contraband property — Claims — Hearings.

In all cases of seizure of any alcoholic beverages or other property subject to forfeiture under the provisions hereof, the officer or other person making the seizure shall proceed as follows:

The officer or other person shall deliver to the person, if any, found in possession of such property, a receipt showing a general description of the seized goods, the reason for the seizure, the procedure by which recovery of the goods may be sought, including the time period in which a claim for recovery must be presented, and the consequences of failing to file within the time period. If the person found in possession of the seized property is not the sole unencumbered owner of same, the commission shall make a reasonable effort to furnish a copy of the receipt to the owner and/or lienholder. A copy of the receipt shall be filed in the office of the commission and shall be open to the public for inspection;

All such property seized and confiscated under this part may be designated by the director for use by the commission for any period of time or shall be sold at public sale by the commissioner of general services when the same has been turned over to the commissioner by the commission as now authorized by law.

Any person claiming any property so seized as contraband goods may, within fifteen (15) days from the date of receipt of notification of seizure, and after executing a bond for costs with one (1) or more good and solvent sureties in the sum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), made payable to the state of Tennessee, file with the commission at Nashville a claim in writing, requesting a hearing and stating the person's interest in the articles seized. An indigent person may file a claim in forma pauperis by filing with the claim an affidavit stating that the indigent person is unable to bear the cost of the proceeding.

The commission shall set a date for hearing within fifteen (15) days from the day the claim is filed.

The commission is empowered to subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance at hearings authorized hereunder. All parties to the proceeding, including the person claiming such property, shall have the right to have subpoenas issued by the commission to compel the attendance of all witnesses deemed by such parties to be necessary for a full and complete hearing. All witnesses shall be entitled to the witness fees and mileage provided by law for legal witnesses, which fees and mileage shall be paid as a part of the costs of such proceeding.

At each hearing authorized in subsection (b), the state shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the seized property was of a nature making its possession illegal or was used in a manner making it subject to forfeiture, under this part, and failure to carry the burden of proof shall operate as a bar to any forfeiture hereunder.

In the event the ruling of the commission is favorable to the claimant, the commission shall deliver to the claimant the alcoholic beverages or property so seized. If the ruling of the commission is adverse to the claimant, the commission shall proceed as to such contraband goods in accordance with the foregoing provisions hereof. The expenses of storage, transportation, etc., shall be adjudged as a part of the cost of the proceeding in such manner as the commission shall fix.

Whenever, in any proceeding under this part, a claim is filed for any vehicle, aircraft or boat seized, as provided in this section, by an owner or other person asserting the interest of the owner, the commissioner shall not allow the claim unless and until the claimant proves that:

The claimant has an interest in such property which the claimant acquired in good faith; and

The claimant had at no time any knowledge or reason to believe that it was being or would be used in the violation of the laws of the United States or of the state of Tennessee relating to liquor.

Whenever, in any proceeding under this section, a claim is filed for any property seized, as provided in this section, by a person who is the holder of a security interest or other claim arising out of a contract or agreement, the commissioner shall not allow the claim unless and until the claimant proves that such claimant has an interest in such property which such claimant acquired in good faith. An interest which is acquired in the ordinary course of business shall be presumed to be in good faith unless the commissioner receives evidence that the holder of the security interest had knowledge, at the time the interest attached, of the intended illegal use of the vehicle or was a co-conspirator in furtherance of the illegal activity. A holder of a security interest which is other than a natural person shall be considered a co-conspirator for purposes of this section, if evidence shows that an officer, employee or agent of the holder acting within the scope of employment is a co-conspirator, and the holder either:

Has actual knowledge of the illegal activities of the officer, employee or agent from an individual other than the officer, employee or agent and fails to take appropriate action; or

The holder has failed to reasonably supervise or monitor the activities of the officer, employee or agent.

In the event the interest of the owner is forfeited as provided in subdivision (e)(1) and the interest of the holder of a security interest is not forfeited as provided in subdivision (e)(2), the commissioner may, at the request of the holder of such interest, return the property to the holder for disposition in accordance with the applicable security agreement or other contract. If the commissioner does not return the property to the holder, the forfeiture shall be subject to the holder's interest.

An owner whose interest is forfeited after being arrested for, or charged with, any felony, shall be ineligible to purchase the property from, or to bid at any sale of the property by, the commissioner or any seizing agency. The owner whose interest is forfeited after being arrested for, or charged with, any felony, shall also be ineligible to redeem the property from, or to bid at any sale of the property by, any holder of a security interest acting pursuant to the agreement contract or title 47, chapter 9.

Pending any proceeding to recover a vehicle, aircraft or boat seized hereunder, the commission may order delivery thereof to any claimant who shall establish the right to immediate possession thereof, and who shall execute, with one (1) or more sureties approved by the commission, and deliver to the commission, a bond in favor of the state of Tennessee for the payment of a sum double the appraised value thereof as of the time of the hearing; and conditioned further that, if the vehicle, aircraft or boat is not returned at the time of hearing, the bond shall stand in lieu of and be forfeited in the same manner as such vehicle, aircraft or boat.

The commission may personally hold such hearings as it may deem proper. In addition thereto, the commission is authorized to designate a hearing officer who may hold such hearings in the place and in the absence of the commission. Such hearing officer shall make findings of fact, conclusions of law, and proposed order based thereon. If the commission concurs, it shall issue the order; or it may, upon review of the record, make such findings, conclusions and issue such order as, in its discretion, the record justifies. At all hearings provided for herein, the commission shall provide a stenographer or court reporter to take a stenographic record of the evidence adduced at such hearing. The claimant or protestant shall be entitled to a copy of the stenographic record, upon application therefor, and upon paying the reasonable cost thereof to be fixed by the commission.

Acts 1941, ch. 119, § 2; 1947, ch. 128, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.25 (Williams, § 6648.27); Acts 1955, ch. 347, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, §§ 5, 14; Acts 1959, ch. 301, § 3; 1959, ch. 302, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; Acts 1963, ch. 258, § 1; 1967, ch. 368, § 1; 1970, ch. 451, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 357, §§ 2-4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-623; Acts 1985, ch. 76, § 3; 1990, ch. 1037, §§ 2, 5.

Cross-References. Procedure for confiscation of property in cases of seizure of narcotic drugs or marijuana, §53-11-201.

Procedure for seizing contraband in cases of seizure of tobacco products, §67-4-1021.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 26, 28.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

57-9-203. Review of action of commission — Appeal to supreme court.

The action of the alcoholic beverage commission may be reviewed by petition for common-law writ of certiorari, addressed to the circuit court of Davidson County, which petition shall be filed within ten (10) days from the date the order of the commission is made.

Immediately upon the grant of the writ of certiorari the commission shall cause to be made, certified and forwarded to the court a complete transcript of the proceedings in the cause, which shall contain all the proof submitted before the commission. All defendants named in the petition desiring to make defense shall answer or otherwise plead to the petition within ten (10) days from the date of the filing of the transcript unless the time be extended by the court.

The decision of the commission shall be reviewed by the circuit court solely upon the pleadings and the transcript of the proceedings before the commission, and neither party shall be entitled to introduce any additional evidence in the circuit court. The confiscated goods shall not be sold pending such review, but shall be stored by the commission until the final disposition of the case.

Within the discretion of the commission, the claimant may be awarded possession of the confiscated goods pending the decision of the circuit court under the petition of certiorari; provided, that the claimant shall be required to execute a bond payable to the state of Tennessee in an amount double the value of the property seized, the sureties to be approved by the commission. The condition of the bond shall be that the obligors shall pay to the state, through the commission, the full value of the goods or property seized, unless upon certiorari the decision of the commission shall be reversed and the property awarded to the claimant.

Either party dissatisfied with the judgment or decree of the circuit court may upon giving bond as required in other suits, appeal to the supreme court, and have a reexamination, in that court, of the whole matter of law and fact appearing in the record. When any such appeal is made, the clerk of the circuit court in which such suit was pending shall include as a part of the record the original certified transcript of the proceedings had before the commission. The appeal shall be advanced upon the docket of the supreme court as one of such precedence, and heard as promptly as practicable.

Acts 1941, ch. 119, § 3; 1945, ch. 88, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.26 (Williams, § 6648.28); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 258, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-624; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 24.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 2, 22, 28.

57-9-204. Forfeiture of unclaimed property — Exclusivity of remedy.

If no claim is interposed, such alcoholic beverages or other property shall be forfeited without further proceedings and the same shall be sold as herein provided.

The above procedure is the sole remedy of any claimant, and no court shall have jurisdiction to interfere therewith by replevin, injunction, supersedeas or in any other manner.

Acts 1941, ch. 119, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.27 (Williams, § 6648.29); Acts 1955, ch. 347, § 7; 1959, ch. 302, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-625.

Cross-References. Procedure for seizing contraband property in cases of seizure of alcoholic beverages, §57-9-202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 28.

57-9-205. Employment of aides and assistants by commission — Disposition of revenues. —

The commission shall have the authority, by and with the consent of the governor, to employ such aides and assistants that may be deemed necessary in the proper enforcement of this part and the collection of all taxes upon alcoholic beverages containing more than five percent (5%) alcohol, whose compensation shall be approved by the governor and paid out of the funds or receipts collected from taxes on alcoholic beverages; provided, however, that the cost of administering the alcoholic beverage statutes shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the gross amount of the revenues collected from such sources, which expenses shall be deducted before any allocation or distribution is made by the state.

The proceeds of all seizures, confiscations and sales made under this part shall be paid by the commission into the state treasury; provided, that ten percent (10%) of such proceeds shall be set aside as expenses for the administration of this part.

All revenues derived from the sales of contraband goods after deducting the expenses of the enforcement of this part shall be distributed as in the case of other revenues from alcoholic beverages; that is, one-half (½) to the state and one-half (½) to the counties, as provided by § 57-3-306.

Acts 1941, ch. 119, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.28 (Williams, § 6648.30); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 258, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-626.

57-9-206. Employees authorized to carry arms — Execution of search warrants.

Any duly authorized representative or employee of the commission, who has been designated by the commission to enforce this part, is authorized and empowered to go armed, or carry a pistol while on active duty engaged in enforcing this part.

Any such duly authorized representative or employee of the commission who has been designated by the commission to enforce this part is authorized and empowered to execute search warrants and do all acts incident thereto, in the same manner as search warrants may be levied by sheriffs and other peace officers.

Acts 1941, ch. 119, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.29 (Williams, § 6648.31); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 258, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-627.